Nevada, session 83, AB434.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 613 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, it is unlawful
for any employer in this State to discharge, discipline,
discriminate, retaliate or take any other adverse employment
action against, or threaten to take any such action against, an
employee because the employee declines to attend a meeting
sponsored by the employer or declines to participate in, receive
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
or listen to any communication by the employer or an agent or
representative thereof where the primary purpose of the meeting
or communication is to communicate the opinion of the employer
regarding:
(a) Religious matters; or
(b) Political matters.
2. The provisions of paragraph (a) of subsection 1 do not
apply:
(a) To an employer described in paragraph (b) of subsection 1
of NRS 613.320; or
(b) If the declination by the employee substantially or
materially interferes with the bona fide job performance of the
employee or the working relationship between the employee and
the employer.
3. An employer who violates the provisions of subsection 1 is
liable to the employee against whom the violation is committed
for:
(a) Damages caused by the adverse employment action;
(b) Any punitive damages that the facts may warrant;
(c) The full amount of gross loss of wages or compensation;
and
(d) Costs and reasonable attorney’s fees as may be allowed by
the court.
4. If the court determines that an action brought by an
employee pursuant to subsection 3 was brought without
substantial justification, the court may award costs and reasonable
attorney’s fees to the employer.
5. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit:
(a) An employer or any agent, representative or designee of the
employer from communicating to an employee any information
that the employer is required by law to communicate to the extent
of that requirement;
(b) An employer or any agent, representative or designee off
the employer from communicating to any employee any
information that is necessary for the employee to perform his or
her job duties;
(c) An institution of higher education or any agent,
representative or designee of the institution from meeting with or
participating in any communication with an employee that is part
of any coursework, symposia or academic program;
(d) Any casual conversation between employees or between an
employee and an agent, representative or designee of an employer,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
so long as the participation in such a conversation is not required;
or
(e) A requirement that is limited to the managerial or
supervisory employees of an employer.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Political matters” means matters relating to elections for
political office, political parties, proposals to change legislation or
regulations or the decision to join or support any political party or
political, civic, community, fraternal or labor organization.
(b) “Religious matters” means matters relating to religious
affiliation or practice or the decision to join or support any
religious organization or association.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)